Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6004.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 30-15 of the General Laws entitled "Emergency Management" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
30-15-46. Funding to support mutual aid control centers.
(a) The general assembly shall make an annual appropriation of not less than eighty
thousand dollars ($80,000) to the Rhode Island emergency management agency in the executive
department and created pursuant to the provisions of §30-15-5, to assist with emergency
communications during major or multiple emergency incidents or when a community has
exhausted its emergency resources and has requested assistance by the control centers under their
mutual aid agreement.
(b) These funds shall be distributed annually as follows:
(1) An amount of not less than twelve thousand five hundred dollars ($12,500) to the
communities designated as metro control, east bay control, northern control, and southern control;
and
(2) An amount of not less than seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) to the
communities designated as back-up control centers.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001609
========